Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.040

Removal of fire hazards—Appeal of order—Penalty.

(1) If the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, finds in any building or premises subject to their inspection under this chapter, any combustible material or flammable conditions or fire hazards dangerous to the safety of the building, premises, or to the public, he or she shall by written order require such condition to be remedied, and such order shall forthwith be complied with by the owner or occupant of the building or premises.

(2) An owner or occupant aggrieved by any such order made by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her deputy, may appeal such order pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. If the order is confirmed, the order shall remain in force and be complied with by the owner or occupant.

(3) Any owner or occupant failing to comply with any such order not appealed from or with any order so confirmed shall be punishable by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than fifty dollars for each day such failure exists.

[ 1995 c 369 s 27; 1986 c 266 s 70; 1985 c 470 s 20; 1947 c 79 s .33.05; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.05. Formerly RCW 48.48.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.